Connecticut, session 2026, HB05013.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to (1) establish a registration fee
for electric vehicles and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles and a per-
kilowatt-hour tax on electricity purchased at public electric vehicle
charging stations, and (2) require the revenue generated from such tax
and fee to be deposited in the Special Transportation Fund.